Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 2

Legislative Proceedings

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2012, No. 210, § 16, provided: “AUDIO/VISUAL POLICY.

The appropriations provided herein to produce audio or video materials by or under the direction of the House of Representatives shall not be used for the following:

“(a)A person may not use audio or video materials produced by or under the direction of the House of Representatives in political or campaign advertising.

“(b)A person may not use audio or video materials produced by or under the direction of the House of Representatives for a commercial purpose.

“(1)In this section, ‘commercial purpose’ means a purpose that is intended to result in a profit or other tangible benefit.

“(c)The House Management Committee may give permission to an entity to use the audio or video materials for public education governmental broadcast which shall not conflict with subsection (b).”

Cross References. Constitutional provisions concerning enactment of laws, Ark. Const., Art. 5, §§ 19 and 21-26.

Printing acts of General Assembly, §25-18-205.

Preambles. Acts 1949, No. 376 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the Constitution of the State of Arkansas provides in Article 5, Section 12 that: ‘Each House shall keep a journal of its proceedings and from time to time publish the same….’”

Effective Dates. Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 88, § 3: effective on passage. Approved Dec. 14, 1875.

Acts 1889, No. 38, § 9: effective eighty days after its passage. Approved Mar. 13, 1889.

Acts 1895, No. 97, § 6: May 1, 1895.

Acts 1949, No. 310, § 3: approved Mar. 19, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that the installation of the electric roll call system has raised unforeseen problems in the accurate recording of facts to be registered by the system, and that this act is necessary to insure the integrity of the records made by the system. An emergency is, accordingly, declared to exist, and this act shall take effect on its passage.”

Acts 1949, No. 376, § 2: Mar. 23, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that the certification of the journals of each House of the General Assembly to the Secretary of State as a public document is in compliance with the Constitution of the State of Arkansas, and in order to prevent the expenditure of any public funds for printing such journals under any printing contracts, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 235, § 4: June 30, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that most of the affairs of this State are conducted by boards and commissions; that the activities of such boards and commissions vitally affect the public peace, health, safety and welfare; that the appointment of capable and qualified members of such boards and commissions is of vital importance for the proper discharge of duties imposed on such boards and commissions; that many appointments are now being made of persons who are not qualified for such positions; that confusion exists in the method of appointments of members of boards and commissions from congressional districts, and clarification of laws governing such appointments is immediately necessary; and, that only by the immediate passage of this Act may the same be corrected. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 182, § 3: Feb. 18, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Boys and Girls State program is of great value to the State of Arkansas, that participation by members of the General Assembly is a direct benefit to the Boys and Girls State program, that per diem and mileage should be allowed to those members of the General Assembly participating in such program, and that this act should be implemented immediately to insure that it will be effective when Boys and Girls State next meets. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 289, § 2: Mar. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that each session of the General Assembly considers numerous bills proposing amendments, changes, or additions to the publicly supported retirement systems, and that due to the limitations of the time available during each Regular and Special Session, there are not sufficient opportunities to adequately study and review many aspects of the retirement systems that would be affected by such proposed legislation; and that the establishment of a Joint Interim Committee of the General Assembly to serve as an overview committee over the various retirement systems is essential to the proper functioning of the General Assembly; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to establish the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs in order that said committee may enter upon its duties immediately upon adjournment of the Seventieth Session of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 806, § 3: Apr. 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 221 of 1977, which requires the filing of a fiscal impact statement with respect to bills that impose new or increased cost obligations on municipalities or counties, is not accomplishing the purposes for which it was initially enacted, and that this act is designed to accomplish procedures more in keeping with the rules and procedures of the two houses of the General Assembly with respect to the consideration of bills which require fiscal impact statements on new or additional costs imposed on municipalities or counties, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to provide for the enactment of said procedure prior to the adjournment of this Regular Session. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1, § 16: Jan. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that matters vitally affecting the welfare of the State of Arkansas must be dealt with by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health, and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 2, § 12: Jan. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that matters vitally affecting the welfare of the State of Arkansas must be dealt with by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 143, § 18: June 23, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that matters vitally affecting the welfare of the State of Arkansas must be dealt with by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1, § 14: Jan. 17, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that matters vitally affecting the welfare of the State of Arkansas must be dealt with by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 2, § 12: Jan. 17, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that matters vitally affecting the welfare of the State of Arkansas must be dealt with by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 30, § 14: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 134, § 12: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 868, § 5: Mar. 29, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the untimely introduction of legislation affecting state-supported retirement systems during a legislative session creates an impossible task for staff and committee members to prepare and analyze fiscal impact statements; that the current method of limiting retirement legislation introduction has not proven adequate; and that the immediate approval of this bill upon passage is required to alleviate this problem during the current legislative session. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 969, § 11: Jan. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent changes in federal law necessitate an immediate change in the method of reimbursing members of the General Assembly for legislative expenses; this Act grants the authority to the House and Senate to establish expense reimbursement procedures; and this should go into effect immediately in order to allow the House and Senate to comply with federal regulations as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 1240, § 11: Jan. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent changes in federal law necessitate an immediate change in the method of reimbursing members of the General Assembly for legislative expenses; this Act grants the authority to the House and Senate to establish expense reimbursement procedures; and this should go into effect immediately in order to allow the House and Senate to comply with federal regulations as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 1, § 11: Jan. 14, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that matters vitally affecting the welfare of the State of Arkansas must be dealt with by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 102, § 5: Feb. 9, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas law provides for a thirty (30) day deadline for the introduction of bills affecting the public retirement programs; that under certain circumstances and in emergencies, the General Assembly may be required to recess for an extended period during the first 30 days of any Regular Session; and that proper consideration of any bills affecting public retirement programs will require the extension of the thirty (30) day deadline. Therefore, in order to provide a procedure to suspend the 30-day introduction deadline, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 671, § 13: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 3, § 17: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 143, § 13: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 3, § 15: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 693, § 13: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2005 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2005 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 151, § 2: February 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current procedure concerning submission and approval or rejection of appointments by the Governor needs revision; and that these revisions are immediately necessary because appointments will be considered during this session of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill;(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 286, § 13: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2007 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2007 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 875, § 2: “This act shall apply beginning with the 2009 Regular Session of the General Assembly.”

Identical Acts 2015, Nos. 555 and 556, § 5: Mar. 20, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the under Amendment 94 the Independent Citizens Commission submitted a recommendation regarding expense reimbursement to the Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; that the Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in coordination with the Independent Citizens Commission are implementing the recommendations submitted; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that provisions of Amendment 94 are carried out in accordance with its language. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

10-2-101. Time for meeting.

The General Assembly shall meet in regular session at 12:00 noon on the second Monday in January in each odd-numbered year.

However, in any odd-numbered year following the election of a nonincumbent governor, the General Assembly upon convening at 12:00 noon on the second Monday in January may remain in session only for such time not to exceed two (2) days as is necessary to open and publish the votes for various constitutional offices, to swear in the state constitutional officers and members of the General Assembly, to organize and select officers, and to otherwise prepare for the regular session.

The General Assembly may then stand in recess for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days.

The General Assembly shall meet in a fiscal session to consider appropriation bills in each even-numbered year at 12:00 noon on the:

Second Monday in February in years in which the preferential primary election is held in May under § 7-7-203; and

Second Wednesday in April in years in which the preferential primary election is held in March under § 7-7-203.

A bill other than an appropriation bill may be considered in a fiscal session if two-thirds (2/3) of the members of each house of the General Assembly approve consideration of the nonappropriation bill.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment to this section expired December 31, 2016. Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 5, provided:

“(a)This act is cumulative of existing laws and shall not repeal but merely suspend any law in conflict with the act.

“(b)The provisions of this act are temporary and expire on December 31, 2016.

“(c)On and after December 31, 2016, the provisions of law suspended by this act shall be in full force and effect.

“(d)The expiration of this act shall not affect rights acquired under it or affect suits then pending.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the subsection and subdivision designations; deleted “biennial” preceding “session” in (a)(1); substituted “The General Assembly” for “It” in (a)(2)(B); and added (b).

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment substituted “Wednesday in April” for “Monday in February” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment, in (b)(1), deleted “at 12:00 noon on the second Monday in February of each even-numbered year” following “session” and added “in each even-numbered year at 12:00 noon on the”; and added (b)(1)(A) and (b)(1)(B).

Cross References. Duration of regular sessions, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 17.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment deleted “Senate Chief of Staff” in the section heading, and deleted (b)(2) and (b)(3).

The 2009 amendment substituted “fiscal sessions, and the regular sessions” for “and the next regular session” in (b).

[Repealed.]

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by identical acts Nos. 555 and 556 repealed (b)(3).

History.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 39, § 1, p. 42; C. & M. Dig., § 4919; Pope's Dig., § 6136; Acts 1981, No. 847, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-101; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 8; 2019, No. 545, § 5.

10-2-102. Duties of Secretary of Senate, Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives, and other officers.

The Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives, with their respective clerical forces, shall perform all duties required in the engrossment and enrollment of bills and all necessary work as clerks of committees.

The employees of the Senate shall perform such duties during the regular session of the General Assembly and during the interim between the convening of special sessions, fiscal sessions, and the regular sessions of the General Assembly as may be provided by the Rules of the Senate or by the Senate Efficiency Committee, subject to the approval of the Senate.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 97, § 4, p. 142; C. & M. Dig., § 4955; Pope's Dig., § 6185; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-407; Acts 1987, No. 2, § 9; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 143, § 9; 1991, No. 30, § 9; 2005, No. 693, § 7; 2007, No. 286, § 7; 2009, No. 962, § 9.

10-2-103. Coordinator of House Legislative Services.

The Coordinator of House Legislative Services shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives with the approval of the House Management Committee.

(1)The Coordinator of House Legislative Services shall perform such duties as may be provided by Rules of the House of Representatives and as provided by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the House Management Committee.

In addition thereto, the Coordinator of House Legislative Services shall hereafter perform all duties imposed upon the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives now provided by law or authorized by Rules of the House of Representatives especially with respect to the disbursement of House funds, the keeping of fiscal accounts and records, the signing of official documents, and the acquisition of stationery, postage, and other supplies for the House of Representatives and its members.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1, § 3; 2015, No. 555, § 1; 2015, No. 556, § 1.

10-2-104. Duties of assistant sergeants at arms.

The assistant sergeant at arms in each house shall perform the duties of doorkeeper and postmaster of his or her respective house.

History.

Acts 1889, No. 38, § 7, p. 52; C. & M. Dig., § 4956; Pope's Dig., § 6186; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-408.

10-2-105. Administration of oaths.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may administer oaths to the members and officers of their respective houses.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, or the chair of a committee of the Senate or of the House of Representatives, or his or her designee, may administer oaths to witnesses in any case under their examination.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

Cross References. Oath of office, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 20.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, § 17; C. & M. Dig., § 4926; Pope's Dig., § 6148; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-102; Acts 2009, No. 1465, § 1.

10-2-106. Elections.

In all elections made by either house or by a joint vote of both houses, the votes of a majority of all the members present shall be necessary to a choice, and when an election shall be by joint vote, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall grant the person so elected a certificate thereof, which, in all cases in which a commission is required, shall be sufficient to authorize the granting of the commission.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, § 16; C. & M. Dig., § 4948; Pope's Dig., § 6170; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-108.

Cross References. Method of taking vote, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 14.

10-2-107. Election of Speaker of the House of Representatives in doubt — Procedure.

If, after the biennial general election and prior to the convening of the regular session, a statement signed by fifty (50) or more members of the House of Representatives who will serve at the next-following regular session of the General Assembly is filed with the current Speaker of the House of Representatives stating that the members believe that the formal election of the new Speaker of the House of Representatives is in doubt, then the current Speaker of the House of Representatives shall call a one-day organizational meeting of all members and members-elect of the House who will serve at the next regular session. This meeting shall be held for the single purpose of designating the Speaker of the House of Representatives for the next General Assembly.

If the special organizational meeting of members of the House is called, all members and members-elect of the House who will serve at the next-following regular session of the General Assembly shall be entitled to receive per diem and mileage for attending the meeting.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in the first sentence of (a), substituted “regular session” for “General Assembly” near the beginning, and inserted “regular” following “next-following.”

A certified transcript of the proceedings of each house of the General Assembly shall be filed with the Secretary of State as a public document and shall be made available in the office of the Secretary of State for the inspection of any citizen requiring information therefrom, but the journals shall not be printed by the State of Arkansas.

Cross References. Duty to keep journals, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 12.

Publication of journals of legislative proceedings, §25-18-204.

Records of General Assembly kept by Secretary of State, §25-16-403.

For the proper passage of an act by the General Assembly, the Constitution requires not merely that the yeas and nays shall be taken on the final passage of the bill but also that the same shall be entered on the journal thus making the journal entry the sole evidence of the proceedings. Niven v. Road Improv. Dist. No. 14, 132 Ark. 240, 200 S.W. 997 (1918).

Cross References. Power to punish for disorderly conduct, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 12.

Cross References. Power to punish for disorderly conduct, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 12.

Cross References. Misdemeanors, §5-1-107.

The legislative printing contract which includes the printing of bills, resolutions, committee reports, special reports, approved acts, and other specified legislative documents shall include the printing of prefiled bills and resolutions filed pursuant to this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment to this section expired December 31, 2016. Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 5, provided:

“(a)This act is cumulative of existing laws and shall not repeal but merely suspend any law in conflict with the act.

“(b)The provisions of this act are temporary and expire on December 31, 2016.

“(c)On and after December 31, 2016, the provisions of law suspended by this act shall be in full force and effect.

“(d)The expiration of this act shall not affect rights acquired under it or affect suits then pending.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (a)(1)(B)(1) and (a)(1)(B)(2), and made related changes.

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment substituted “March” for “January” in (a)(1)(B)(i).

The 2019 amendment redesignated former (a)(1)(B)(i) as (a)(1)(B); added “which is held in a year in which the preferential primary election is held in May under §7-7-203; and” in (a)(1)(B); added (a)(1)(C); and redesignated former (a)(1)(B)(ii) and (a)(2) as (a)(2) and (a)(3).

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (b)(2) and (c), and redesignated subsections accordingly; and in (b)(1), substituted “thirty (30) days” for “ten (10) days.”

The 2009 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “a regular session and within fifteen (15) days after the General Assembly convenes in a fiscal” for the first occurrence of “regular” and inserted “or fiscal session” preceding “of the General Assembly”; and substituted “regular session, fiscal session, or” for “regular session or” in (b)(2).

Cross References. Appointment, confirmation of honorary board and commission members, §25-17-204.

Copies of fiscal impact statements prepared in compliance with the provisions of this section shall be made available upon request for them to representatives of municipal or county governments. A fiscal impact statement filed or prepared in compliance with this section is declared to be a public record within the meaning of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

For the purposes of this section, the term “fiscal impact statement” means a realistic statement of the estimated financial cost to municipalities or counties of implementing or complying with a proposed law and rules promulgated under it.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1985, No. 806, § 1, is also codified as §19-1-303.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 43, § 1, is also codified as §19-1-303.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (f).

Cross References. Filing of proposed bills with interim committees, §10-3-217.

Fiscal notes required for bills relating to public retirement or social security programs, §10-3-702.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “regular session” for “regular biennial session” throughout; and inserted “or fiscal session” preceding “of the General Assembly” in (c).

Cross References. Fiscal notes required for bills relating to public retirement or social security programs, §10-3-702.

“This bill having been returned by the Governor with his or her objections thereto and, after reconsideration having passed both houses by the constitutional majority, has become a law thisday of”.

Cross References. Passage of bills over veto of Governor, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 15.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 208, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-145; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 10.

10-2-108. Manuscripts of daily proceedings — Journals.

Whenever the daily proceedings of either house of the General Assembly shall be made up in manuscript form, the manuscript shall be signed each day by the presiding officers of the respective houses and attested by the secretary or clerk thereof.

In addition to the transcribed record of the journals of either house, the manuscript proceedings shall also be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, which manuscript proceedings shall be kept and preserved by the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 88, § 2, p. 168; C. & M. Dig., § 4949; Pope's Dig., § 6171; Acts 1949, No. 376, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-109, 4-116.

10-2-109. Joint sessions.

When by the Constitution or laws of the state a joint meeting of the Senate and House of Representatives is required, they shall assemble with their clerks on the day and at the hour previously agreed on for that purpose in the hall of the House of Representatives.

When the meeting is assembled, the President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall preside in conjunction, and the meeting shall be governed by such standing rules as shall have been adopted for that purpose by the concurrence of both houses. They shall have power to punish any person other than a member for disorderly or contemptuous behavior in their presence by fine and imprisonment in the same manner and to the same extent as either house may do for like conduct before it by the Constitution and laws of this state.

Any member of either house who shall be guilty of disorderly behavior in the presence of the meeting may be punished by the house of which he or she is a member in the same manner as if the offense had been committed in the presence of that house.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, §§ 1-3; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4934-4936; Pope's Dig., §§ 6156-6158; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-103 — 4-105.

10-2-110. Disorderly conduct.

If any person, whether a member or not, shall be guilty of any disorder in the presence of either house or a Committee of the Whole, or in a joint meeting of both houses, while in session, the presiding officer of the house or joint meeting or Chair of the Committee of the Whole may order the person into immediate custody. The sergeant at arms shall immediately take the person into custody and detain him or her until the further order of the house, joint meeting, or Committee of the Whole, before which offense was committed.

If any person, whether a member or not, shall disturb the proceedings of any committee of either house or be guilty of disorderly conduct in their presence, the house appointing the committee may punish the person in the same manner as if the offense had been committed in the presence of the house. If the disorder or offense shall be committed before a joint committee of both houses, the President of the Senate shall issue process, and both houses shall proceed in joint meeting.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 90, §§ 4, 5; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4924, 4925; Pope's Dig., §§ 6145, 6146; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-106, 4-107.